Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5479.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 4gg. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, the sale of eligible
fuel is exempt from the tax under this act.
(2) The sale of electric fuel to propel a vehicle is exempt
from the tax under this act if that electric fuel is taxed under
either the motor carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211 to
207.234, or the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to
207.1170.
(3) (2) As used in this section:
(a) "Alternative fuel" means that term as defined in section
JJR H03610'25 (H-1) j6o32u


151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151.
(b) "Electric fuel" means that term as defined in section 157
of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1157.
(c) (b) "Eligible fuel" means motor fuel, alternative fuel,
and leaded racing fuel, except that eligible fuel does not include
any of the following:
(i) Motor fuel that is sold for use in aircraft if the
purchaser paid the privilege tax imposed by section 203 of the
aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL
259.203, on the motor fuel and the purchaser is registered under
section 94 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1094, if
required to be registered under that section.
(ii) Aviation fuel on which the privilege tax is due under
section 203 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945
PA 327, MCL 259.203.
(iii) Motor fuel on which the privilege tax imposed under
section 203 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945
PA 327, MCL 259.203, has been paid and that is identified on the
shipping paper or invoice as aviation fuel and sold as aviation
fuel.
(iv) Motor fuel or alternative fuel sold for residential,
commercial, or industrial use for heating, cooling, or ventilation
purposes, such as for use in home or building utility systems,
furnaces, boilers, space heaters, water heaters, dryers and similar
appliances, and heat pumps, including, but not limited to, motor
fuel or alternative fuel that is exempt from the sales tax at the
additional rate of 2% approved by the electors on March 15, 1994
under section 4n.
(v) Liquified petroleum gas, unless the liquified petroleum
JJR H03610'25 (H-1) j6o32u


gas is used or for use as those terms are defined in section 151(j)
of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1151.
(d) (c) "Leaded racing fuel" means that term as defined in
section 4 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1004.
(e) (d) "Liquified petroleum gas" means that term as defined
in section 151 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL
207.1151.
(f) (e) "Motor fuel" means that term as defined in section 4
of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1004.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are
enacted into law:
(a) House Bill No. 5434.
(b) House Bill No. 5435.
Final Page
JJR H03610'25 (H-1) j6o32u